Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5565YH (3) 91 lh/ns H.F. 2174 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 602.1615 Legal services for 1 indigent parties task force. 2 1. The judicial branch shall establish a task force that 3 shall do all of the following: 4 a. Identify how legal services are delivered in this state 5 to indigent parties in criminal, juvenile, and child abuse and 6 neglect proceedings statewide. 7 b. Recommend improvements to the delivery of legal services 8 to indigent parties. 9 c. Recommend methods for providing legal services in cases 10 involving conflicts of interest where local public defenders 11 may be unable to accept representation. 12 d. Evaluate and recommend ways to ensure indigent parties 13 receive competent representation. 14 e. Identify potential funding options to support the 15 delivery of legal services for indigent parties. 16 f. Identify strategies to increase the number of qualified 17 attorneys needed to provide legal representation to all 18 residents of this state. 19 2. The task force shall consist of the following members: 20 a. A member appointed by the chief justice of the supreme 21 court. 22 b. A member appointed by the governor. 23 c. A member appointed by the attorney general. 24 d. A member appointed by the state public defender. 25 e. A member in good standing with the Iowa state bar 26 association appointed by the association. 27 f. A member in good standing with the Iowa association for 28 justice appointed by the association. 29 g. A county attorney appointed by the Iowa county attorneys 30 association. 31 h. A member appointed by the dean of the Drake university 32 law school. 33 i. A member appointed by the dean of the university of Iowa 34 college of law. 35 -1- LSB 5565YH (3) 91 lh/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2174 j. A member of the house of representatives appointed by the 1 speaker of the house. 2 k. A member of the senate appointed by the majority leader 3 of the senate. 4 3. For the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 5 November 15, 2030, the task force shall convene at least once 6 each calendar year, and may convene more frequently as deemed 7 necessary by a majority vote of the task force. 8 4. For the period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 9 November 15, 2030, the judicial branch shall submit a report 10 to the governor and the general assembly containing the task 11 forceâs findings and recommendations on or before November 15 12 annually. 13 5. Members of the task force shall serve without 14 compensation but may be reimbursed for actual expenses in 15 the performance of their duties. Task force members who are 16 members of the general assembly shall be paid in accordance 17 with section 2.32A. The remaining task force members shall be 18 reimbursed from moneys appropriated for the purpose of this 19 section or otherwise appropriated to the judicial branch. 20 6. This section is repealed November 15, 2030, and the task 21 force shall dissolve on that date. 22